Connecticut, session 2026, HB05382.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Comptroller shall conduct a
2 study of health insurance coverage for retired police officers and
3 firefighters in the state. Such study shall include, but need not be limited
4 to, an assessment of any gaps in, or lack of, health insurance coverage,
5 or diminished health insurance coverage for police officers and
6 firefighters in the state who are no longer employed as police officers or
7 firefighters due to normal retirement or early retirement as a result of
8 any illness or injury. Not later than January 1, 2027, the Comptroller
9 shall submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
10 of the general statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General
11 Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to labor and public
12 employees on the findings of such study. For purposes of this section,
13 "police officer" has the same meaning as provided in section 7-294a of
HB5382 / File No. 100 1

HB5382 File No. 100
14 the general statutes and "firefighter" has the same meaning as provided
15 in section 7-313g of the general statutes.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
LAB Joint Favorable
HB5382 / File No. 100 2

HB5382 File No. 100
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires the Comptroller to study health insurance coverage
for retired police officers and firefighters which does not result in a fiscal
impact since the agency has the expertise to complete the study.
HB5382 / File No. 100 3

HB5382 File No. 100
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5382
AN ACT REQUIRING THE COMPTROLLER TO CONDUCT A STUDY
OF HEALTH INSURANCE COVERAGE FOR RETIRED POLICE
OFFICERS AND FIREFIGHTERS.